Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.166

Voting and classes of managers.

(1) In a manager-managed limited liability company:

(a) A difference arising as to a matter in the ordinary course of the activities of the limited liability company may be decided by the vote, approval, or consent of a majority of the managers; and

(b) No manager consent, approval, or recommendation is required for any act approved by the members as provided in RCW 25.15.121(2), for a conversion approved as provided in RCW 25.15.441, or for a merger approved as provided in RCW 25.15.421.

(2) A limited liability company agreement may provide for classes or groups of managers having such relative rights, powers, and duties as the limited liability company agreement may provide, and may make provision for the future creation in the manner provided in the limited liability company agreement of additional classes or groups of managers having such relative rights, powers, and duties as may from time to time be established, including rights, powers, and duties senior to existing classes and groups of managers. A limited liability company agreement may provide for the taking of an action, including the amendment of the limited liability company agreement, without the vote or approval of any manager or class or group of managers, including an action to create under the provisions of the limited liability company agreement a class or group of limited liability company interests that was not previously outstanding.

(3) A limited liability company agreement may grant to all or certain identified managers or a specified class or group of the managers the right to vote, separately or with all or any class or group of managers or members, on any matter. If the limited liability company agreement so provides, voting by managers may be on a financial interest, class, group, or any other basis.

(4) A limited liability company agreement which contains provisions related to voting rights of managers may set forth provisions relating to notice of the time, place, or purpose of any meeting at which any matter is to be voted on by any manager or class or group of managers, waiver of any such notice, action by consent without a meeting, the establishment of a record date, quorum requirements, voting in person or by proxy, or any other matter with respect to the exercise of any such right to vote.

[ 2015 c 188 s 35.]